Massachusetts, session 194th, S632.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 360 of the acts of 1984 is hereby amended by inserting 
after the word “lands”, in lines 2 and 5, the word:- “, waters”. 
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 360 is hereby further amended by inserting at 
the end thereof the following clause:- 
(m) All lands, waters and buildings acquired, leased or administratively controlled by the 
National Park Service on or after the effective date of this act. 
SECTION 3. Section 2 of said chapter 360 of the acts of 1984 is hereby amended by 
inserting at the end thereof the following:- Concurrent jurisdiction over any lands, waters or 
buildings under clause (m) of section 1 shall vest in the United States of America when the 

of 2 10 Director of the National Park Service files a notice of such acceptance with the governor and 
state secretary.